Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that with the coming "silver tsunami" our state needs additional services from behavioral health, dental, nursing and relevant providers. The state further finds that the University of Washington behavioral health and medical sciences programs are nationally renowned, with the expertise for the needed additional services.Therefore, the legislature intends to create the University of Washington health sciences campus in order to provide the necessary services that our communities require.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The Evergreen State College is abolished effective July 1, 2026, and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the University of Washington under chapter 28B.20 RCW as the University of Washington health sciences campus. All references to The Evergreen State College in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the University of Washington health sciences campus. The University of Washington health sciences campus shall assume ownership responsibility for all land, buildings, and property of The Evergreen State College.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) The University of Washington health sciences campus is established effective July 1, 2026.(2) The University of Washington health sciences campus shall assume ownership of all land, buildings, and property of The Evergreen State College in this chapter.(3) The mission of the University of Washington health sciences campus is to provide baccalaureate and graduate degrees that are integral to supporting the health care system and meeting the health needs of Washingtonians. The mission will be achieved by working in partnership with the health care sector and business and industry, as well as local and global organizations to develop academic programs that foster economic vitality and create prosperous, healthy communities.(4) The board of regents of the University of Washington shall appoint a nine-member advisory committee consisting of representation from the health care sector, business, and community representatives to provide advice and counsel regarding the administration of the University of Washington health sciences campus. The advisory committee must work with relevant stakeholders in determining what degrees will be offered to meet the health care system's workforce needs. At minimum, the degrees offered must support the nursing, dental, and behavioral health provider workforce. The curriculum for each respective degree must be singularly focused on preparing students for a profession in their health care field. For purposes of this subsection, "the behavioral health provider workforce" means addiction counselors, mental health counselors, therapists, social workers, and related providers.(5)(a) The board of regents of the University of Washington shall:(i) Immediately appoint a new interim chancellor of the University of Washington health sciences campus and begin a comprehensive search for a chancellor and leadership of the institute;(ii) Conduct a formal program review of all academic degrees and programs offered by The Evergreen State College and identify closure dates for programs not aligned with the university's mission by July 1, 2028. The University of Washington health sciences campus has until July 1, 2030, to close programs not conforming with the academic mission; and(iii) Establish a coordinating and planning council responsible for long-range and strategic planning, interinstitutional collaboration, collaboration with the community served, and dispute resolution for the university. The coordinating and planning council must include the following individuals:(A) The chancellor of the University of Washington health sciences campus, or his or her designee;(B) The provost of the University of Washington health sciences campus, or his or her designee;(C) The president of South Puget Sound Community College;(D) A student enrolled at the University of Washington health sciences campus, following the full establishment of the campus, which may be no later than July 1, 2030, appointed by the coordinating and planning council;(E) The chair of the board of regents of the University of Washington, as the nonvoting chair;(F) A community leader appointed by the chair of the board of regents of the University of Washington; and(G) A community leader appointed by the mayor of Olympia.(b) The coordinating and planning council may appoint other groups, as appropriate, to advise on administration and operations, and may alter its own composition by agreement of all the members.(6) By July 1, 2026, the board of regents must adopt a policy that establishes credit or course equivalencies for all credits earned from The Evergreen State College. If a suitable equivalency does not exist at the University of Washington health sciences campus, credits or course equivalencies may be awarded for comparable alternatives at the University of Washington, Seattle; University of Washington, Bothell; or University of Washington, Tacoma. It is the legislature's intent that students who earned credits from The Evergreen State College are awarded sufficient credits or course equivalencies from the University of Washington to maintain their current academic standing.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) By July 1, 2028, the board of regents of the University of Washington shall submit a 10-year plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature on financial solubility and sustainability of the University of Washington health sciences campus including, but not limited to:(a) Current and projected enrollment of the University of Washington health sciences campus as well as tuition revenue;(b) Current and planned academic program offerings in alignment with the mission of the institute and regional, state, and national needs;(c) Capital construction needs based on the change in mission of the institute;(d) Current and expected operating budget needs to address the change in mission of the institute;(e) Current and future plans to meet ongoing debt servicing needs of The Evergreen State College; and(f) Planned sales or other dispositions of any properties formerly owned by The Evergreen State College.(2) This section expires August 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The code reviser shall note wherever The Evergreen State College's duties are transferred or consolidated under this act to the University of Washington health sciences campus. The code reviser shall prepare legislation for the 2026 regular session that changes all statutory references from The Evergreen State College to the University of Washington health sciences campus.--- END ---